Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0603

Qualifications of directors.

(1) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, and subject to subsection (3) of this section, each director of a limited cooperative association must be an individual who is a member of the association or an individual who is designated by a member that is not an individual for purposes of qualifying and serving as a director. Initial directors need not be members.

(2) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director may be an officer or employee of the limited cooperative association.

(3) If the organic rules provide for nonmember directors, at least two-thirds of the directors must be members.

(4) The organic rules may provide qualifications for directors in addition to those in this section.

[ 2019 c 37 s 603.]